Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 13

Conflict of Interest

33-2-1301. Department officers, employees and licensees to disclose interest in mental health facilities — Conflict of interest.

IF

a person is an officer or employee of the department, OR

a person is an officer or employee of a licensee of the department, AND

the person or the person's spouse, parent, grandparent, brother, sister, or child has an ownership interest in a residential facility that is not publicly held or an ownership interest in a business that is not publicly held that owns or manages a residential facility that provides mental health or developmental disabilities services or supports, OR

the person or combination of persons named in subdivision (2)(A) has an ownership interest of at least thirty-five percent (35%) in a residential facility that is publicly held that provides mental health or developmental disabilities services, OR

the person or combination of persons named in subdivision (2)(A), has an ownership interest of at least thirty-five percent (35%) in a business that is publicly held that owns or manages a residential facility that provides mental health or developmental disabilities services,

THEN

the person shall disclose the interest to the department or licensee, AND

the person may not serve in a capacity of decision making or influence or responsibility for the direct referral or placement of persons to any residential facility that provides mental health or developmental disabilities services or supports.

Acts 1996, ch. 669, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-3-112(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. State officers and employees; conflict of interest; rebate, gifts, etc., from contractors prohibited, § 12-4-106.

33-2-1302. Penalty for violation of § 33-2-1301.

If a person violates § 33-2-1301, the commissioner shall assess a civil penalty of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per incident against the person for each violation.

A penalty shall be assessed only after an informal hearing is held in the same manner as an informal hearing is held prior to the suspension of a license under § 4-5-320(d).

If services or supports to a recipient of mental health or developmental disabilities services or supports have been provided in violation of § 33-2-1301, the commissioner may:

Require transfer of the recipient of services or supports to another provider of services or supports as soon as is reasonably practical;

Authorize the recipient of services or supports to remain with the provider of services or supports if the commissioner determines it to be in the best interests of the recipient of services or supports to remain with the provider of services or supports;

Restrict the referral of other recipients of services or supports to the provider of services or supports;

Exercise a combination of the preceding powers; or

Impose any other appropriate sanctions in the discretion of the commissioner.

Acts 1996, ch. 669, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-3-112(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-1303. Contractors to disclose interest in facility.

A person to whom this part applies shall disclose the information required by this part before being hired or as a part of a contract entered into with a provider of mental health or developmental disabilities services or supports. Failure to disclose the information shall subject the person to removal from the position held or the contract to cancellation or renegotiation.

Acts 1996, ch. 669, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-3-112(c); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-1304. Personnel records to indicate conflict of interest as reason for relief of duties.

If a person is relieved of decision-making authority or responsibility under this part, the personnel records of the officer or employee shall state that the officer or employee was relieved of authority or responsibility solely to conform to this part.

Acts 1996, ch. 669, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-3-112(d); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.